Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-909
Department; victim; provide support services; plan of action.

The department shall, in addition to the emergency services, provide support services as needed to a victim of domestic abuse for up to thirty days. The support services shall be problem oriented and formulate a plan of action for the victim. Such services may include relocation, financial security, employment, advocacy, assertiveness training, substance abuse counseling, and alternatives to returning to the abuser. Also, the department shall provide services for children including day care, education, and counseling.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 9.